Illinois, session 104th, HB5128.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 15. The Paid Leave for All Workers Act is amended 5by changing Sections 10, 15, 30, and 35 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 192/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Construction industry" means any constructing, altering, 9reconstructing, repairing, rehabilitating, refinishing, 10refurbishing, remodeling, remediating, renovating, custom 11fabricating, maintenance, landscaping, improving, wrecking, 12painting, decorating, demolishing, or adding to or subtracting 13from any building, structure, highway, roadway, street, 14bridge, alley, sewer, ditch, sewage disposal plant, 15waterworks, parking facility, railroad, excavation or other 16structure, project, development, real property, or 17improvement, or to do any part thereof, whether or not the 18performance of the work herein described involves the addition 19to or fabrication into, any structure, project, development, 20real property, or improvement herein described of any material 21or article of merchandise.22    "Construction industry" also includes moving construction 23related materials on the job site or to or from the job site,   HB5128- 2 -LRB104 18809 SPS 32252 b1snow plowing, snow removal, and refuse collection.2    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Labor.3    "Domestic work" and "domestic worker" have the same 4meanings as defined in Section 10 of the Domestic Workers' 5Bill of Rights Act, except that "domestic worker" also 6includes independent contractors, sole proprietors, and 7partnerships.8    "Employee" has the same application and meaning as that 9provided in Sections 1 and 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 10Collection Act. "Employee" also includes all domestic workers, 11and, for the purposes of this Act, domestic workers shall not 12be excluded as employees under the provisions of item (1), 13(2), or (3) of Section 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 14Collection Act. "Employee" does not include: 15        (1) an employee as defined in the federal Railroad 16    Unemployment Insurance Act (45 U.S.C. 351 et seq.) or the 17    Railway Labor Act; 18        (2) a student enrolled in and regularly attending 19    classes in a college or university that is also the 20    student's employer, and who is employed on a temporary 21    basis at less than full time at the college or university, 22    but this exclusion applies only to work performed for that 23    college or university; or24        (3) a short-term employee who is employed by an 25    institution of higher education for less than 2 26    consecutive calendar quarters during a calendar year and   HB5128- 3 -LRB104 18809 SPS 32252 b1    who does not have a reasonable expectation that they will 2    be rehired by the same employer of the same service in a 3    subsequent calendar year; . 4        (4) an employee engaged in the transportation of goods 5    through this State, including an employee engaged in the 6    operation of a vessel that is documented by the United 7    States under 46 U.S.C. 12105; 8        (5) an employee who is able to decide what time and day 9    the employee performs duties for an employer; or 10        (6) an employee who is employed by an employer with 11    fewer than 15 employees. 12    "Employer" has the same application and meaning as that 13provided in Sections 1 and 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 14Collection Act, except that for purposes of this Act, 15"employer" also means the State and units of local government, 16any political subdivision of the State or units of local 17government, or any State or local government agency. 18    "Employer" does not include school districts organized 19under the School Code or park districts organized under the 20Park District Code. 21    "Writing" or "written" means a printed or printable 22communication in physical or electronic format, including a 23communication that is transmitted through electronic mail, 24text message, or a computer system or is otherwise sent or 25stored electronically.26(Source: P.A. 102-1143, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB5128- 4 -LRB104 18809 SPS 32252 b1    (820 ILCS 192/15)2    Sec. 15. Provision of paid leave. 3    (a) An employee who works in Illinois is entitled to earn 4and use up to a minimum of 40 hours of paid leave during a 512-month period or a pro rata number of hours of paid leave 6under the provisions of subsection (b). The paid leave may be 7used by the employee for any purpose as long as the paid leave 8is taken in accordance with the provisions of this Act.9    (b) Paid leave under this Act shall accrue at the rate of 10one hour of paid leave for every 40 hours worked up to a 11minimum of 40 hours of paid leave or such greater amount if the 12employer provides more than 40 hours. Employees who are exempt 13from the overtime requirements of the federal Fair Labor 14Standards Act (29 U.S.C. 213(a)(1)) shall be deemed to work 40 15hours in each workweek for purposes of paid leave accrual 16unless their regular workweek is less than 40 hours, in which 17case paid leave accrues based on that regular workweek. 18Employees shall determine how much paid leave they need to 19use; however, employers may set a reasonable minimum increment 20for the use of paid leave not to exceed 2 hours per day. If an 21employee's scheduled workday is less than 2 hours per day, the 22employee's scheduled workday shall be used to determine the 23amount of paid leave. Employers who voluntarily provide all 24employees with one hour of paid leave for every 40 hours worked 25in a 12-month period are exempt from this Act.   HB5128- 5 -LRB104 18809 SPS 32252 b1    (c) An employer may make available the minimum number of 2hours of paid leave, subject to pro rata requirements provided 3in subsection (b), to an employee on the first day of 4employment or the first day of the 12-month period. Employers 5that provide the minimum number of hours of paid leave to an 6employee on the first day of employment or the first day of the 712-month period are not required to carry over paid leave from 812-month period to 12-month period and may require employees 9to use all paid leave prior to the end of the benefit period or 10forfeit the unused paid leave. However, under no circumstances 11shall an employee be credited with paid leave that is less than 12what the employee would have accrued under subsections (a) and 13(g) of this Section.14    (d) The 12-month period may be any consecutive 12-month 15period designated by the employer in writing at the time of 16hire. Changes to the 12-month period may be made by the 17employer if notice is given to employees in writing prior to 18the change and the change does not reduce the eligible accrual 19rate and paid leave available to the employee. If the employer 20changes the designated 12-month period, the employer shall 21provide the employee with documentation of the balance of 22hours worked, paid leave accrued and taken, and the remaining 23paid leave balance.24    (e) Paid leave under this Act may be taken by an employee 25for any reason of the employee's choosing. An employee is not 26required to provide an employer a reason for the leave and may   HB5128- 6 -LRB104 18809 SPS 32252 b1not be required to provide documentation or certification as 2proof or in support of the leave. An employee may choose 3whether to use paid leave provided under this Act prior to 4using any other leave provided by the employer or State law.5    (f) Employees shall be paid their hourly rate of pay for 6paid leave. However, employees engaged in an occupation in 7which gratuities or commissions have customarily and usually 8constituted and have been recognized as part of the 9remuneration for hire purposes shall be paid by their employer 10at least the full minimum wage in the jurisdiction in which 11they are employed when paid leave is taken. This wage shall be 12treated as the employee's regular rate of pay for purposes of 13this Act.14    (g) Paid leave under this Act shall begin to accrue at the 15commencement of employment or on the effective date of this 16Act, whichever is later. Employees shall be entitled to begin 17using paid leave 90 days following commencement of their 18employment or 90 days following the effective date of this 19Act, whichever is later.20    (h) Paid leave under this Act shall be provided upon the 21oral or written request of an employee in accordance with the 22employer's reasonable paid leave policy notification 23requirements which may include the following: 24        (1) If use of paid leave under this Act is 25    foreseeable, the employer may require the employee to 26    provide 7 calendar days' notice before the date the leave   HB5128- 7 -LRB104 18809 SPS 32252 b1    is to begin. 2        (2) If paid leave under this Act is not foreseeable, 3    the employee shall provide such notice as soon as is 4    practicable after the employee is aware of the necessity 5    of the leave. An employer that requires notice of paid 6    leave under this Act when the leave is not foreseeable 7    shall provide a written policy that contains procedures 8    for the employee to provide notice.9        (3) Employers shall provide employees with written 10    notice of the paid leave policy notification requirements 11    in this Section in the manner provided in Section 20 for 12    notice and posting and within 5 calendar days of any 13    change to the employer's reasonable paid leave policy 14    notification requirements. 15        (4) An employer may not require, as a condition of 16    providing paid leave under this Act, that the employee 17    search for or find a replacement worker to cover the hours 18    during which the employee takes paid leave.19    (i) Except as provided in subsection (c), paid leave under 20this Act shall carry over annually to the extent not used by 21the employee, provided that nothing in this Act shall be 22construed to require an employer to provide more than 40 hours 23of paid leave for an employee in the 12-month period unless the 24employer agrees to do so. 25    (j) Nothing in this Section or any other Illinois law or 26rule shall be construed as requiring financial or other   HB5128- 8 -LRB104 18809 SPS 32252 b1payment to an employee from an employer upon the employee's 2termination, resignation, retirement, or other separation from 3employment for paid leave accrued under this Act that has not 4been used. Nothing in this Section or any other Illinois law or 5rule shall be construed as requiring financial or other 6reimbursements to an employee from an employer for unused paid 7leave under this Act at the end of the benefit year or any 8other time. 9    (k) If an employee is transferred to a separate division, 10entity, or location, but remains employed by the same 11employer, the employee is entitled to all paid leave accrued 12at the prior division, entity, or location and is entitled to 13use all paid leave as provided in this Section. If there is a 14separation from employment and the employee is rehired within 1512 months of separation by the same employer, previously 16accrued paid leave that had not been used by the employee shall 17be reinstated. The employee shall be entitled to use accrued 18paid leave at the commencement of employment following a 19separation from employment of 12 months or less.20    (l) Paid leave under this Act shall not be charged or 21otherwise credited to an employee's paid time off bank or 22employee account unless the employer's policy permits such a 23credit. If the paid leave under this Act is credited to an 24employee's paid time off bank or employee vacation account 25then any unused paid leave shall be paid to the employee upon 26the employee's termination, resignation, retirement, or other   HB5128- 9 -LRB104 18809 SPS 32252 b1separation to the same extent as vacation time under existing 2Illinois law or rule. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to 3waive or otherwise limit an employee's right to final 4compensation for promised and earned, but unpaid vacation time 5or paid time off, as provided under the Illinois Wage Payment 6and Collection Act and rules. Employers shall provide 7employees with written notice of changes to the employer's 8vacation time, paid time off, or other paid leave policies 9that affect an employee's right to final compensation for such 10leave. 11    (m) During any period an employee takes leave under this 12Act, the employer shall maintain coverage for the employee and 13any family member under any group health plan for the duration 14of such leave at no less than the level and conditions of 15coverage that would have been provided if the employee had not 16taken the leave. The employer shall notify the employee that 17the employee is still responsible for paying the employee's 18share of the cost of the health care coverage, if any. 19    (n) Nothing in this Act shall be deemed to interfere with, 20impede, or in any way diminish the right of employees to 21bargain collectively with their employers through 22representatives of their own choosing in order to establish 23wages or other conditions of work in excess of the applicable 24minimum standards established in this Act. The paid leave 25requirements of this Act may be waived in a bona fide 26collective bargaining agreement, but only if the waiver is set   HB5128- 10 -LRB104 18809 SPS 32252 b1forth explicitly in such agreement in clear and unambiguous 2terms.3    Nothing in this Act shall be deemed to affect the validity 4or change the terms of bona fide collective bargaining 5agreements in effect on January 1, 2024. After that date, 6requirements of this Act may be waived in a bona fide 7collective bargaining agreement, but only if the waiver is set 8forth explicitly in such agreement in clear and unambiguous 9terms.10    In no event shall this Act apply to any employee working in 11the construction industry who is covered by a bona fide 12collective bargaining agreement, nor shall this Act apply to 13any employee who is covered by a bona fide collective 14bargaining agreement with an employer that provides services 15nationally and internationally of delivery, pickup, and 16transportation of parcels, documents, and freight.17    Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, nothing 18in this Act shall be deemed to affect the validity or change 19the terms of a bona fide collective bargaining agreement 20applying to an employee who is employed by a State agency that 21is in effect on July 1, 2024. After that date, requirements of 22this Act may be waived in a bona fide collective bargaining 23agreement, but only if the waiver is set forth explicitly in 24such agreement in clear and unambiguous terms. As used in this 25subsection, "State agency" has the same meaning as set forth 26in Section 4 of the Forms Notice Act.  HB5128- 11 -LRB104 18809 SPS 32252 b1    (o) An agreement by an employee to waive his or her rights 2under this Act is void as against public policy.3    (p) The provisions of this Act shall not apply to any 4employer that is covered by a municipal or county ordinance 5that is in effect on the effective date of this Act that 6requires employers to give any form of paid leave to their 7employees, including paid sick leave or paid leave. 8Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, any 9employer that is not required to provide paid leave to its 10employees, including paid sick leave or paid leave, under a 11municipal or county ordinance that is in effect on the 12effective date of this Act shall be subject to the provisions 13of this Act if the employer would be required to provide paid 14leave under this Act to its employees.15    Any local ordinance that provides paid leave, including 16paid sick leave or paid leave, enacted or amended after the 17effective date of this Act must comply with the requirements 18of this Act or provide benefits, rights, and remedies that are 19greater than or equal to the benefits, rights, and remedies 20afforded under this Act.21    An employer in a municipality or county that enacts or 22amends a local ordinance that provides paid leave, including 23paid sick leave or paid leave, after the effective date of this 24Act shall only comply with the local ordinance or ordinances 25so long as the benefits, rights, and remedies are greater than 26or equal to the benefits, rights, and remedies afforded under   HB5128- 12 -LRB104 18809 SPS 32252 b1this Act.2(Source: P.A. 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 3    (820 ILCS 192/30)4    Sec. 30. Department responsibilities. 5    (a) The Department shall administer and enforce this Act. 6The Department has the powers and the parties have the rights 7provided in the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act for 8contested cases.9    (b) An employee may file a complaint with the Department 10alleging violations of the Act within 3 years after the 11alleged violation. An employer that violates this Act is 12liable to any affected employee for damages in the form of the 13actual underpayment, compensatory damages, and a penalty of 14not less than $500 and no more than $1,000. Employees shall 15also be entitled to such equitable relief as may be 16appropriate, in addition to reasonable attorney's fees; 17reasonable expert witness fees, and other costs of the action, 18which shall be paid by the employer to the employee. 19    (c) The Department has the power to conduct investigations 20in connection with the administration and enforcement of this 21Act. The Department shall make a determination of the severity 22of a violation by considering the totality of the 23circumstances, prior to conducting , including the power to 24conduct depositions and discovery and issuing to issue 25subpoenas. If the Department finds cause to believe that this   HB5128- 13 -LRB104 18809 SPS 32252 b1Act has been violated, the Department shall notify the parties 2in writing of the violation, the applicable penalty as 3described in Section 35, and the 14-day period provided to 4cure the violation, and the matter shall be referred to an 5Administrative Law Judge to schedule a formal hearing in 6accordance with hearing procedures established by rule. 7Administrative decisions shall be reviewed under the 8Administrative Review Law.9    (d) The Department is authorized to impose civil penalties 10prescribed in Section 35 for any violation of this Act. 11    (e) The Department is authorized to collect and supervise 12the payment of any damages awarded pursuant to Section 25 and 13subsection (b) of this Section to an employee or employees 14under this Act. Any sums recovered by the Department on behalf 15of an employee or employees under this Act shall be paid to the 16employee or employees affected. The Department is not 17authorized to collect and supervise the payment of any awarded 18attorney's fees. Those fees shall be subject to collection by 19the attorney awarded such fees.20    (f) The Attorney General may bring an action to enforce 21the collection of any awards made under this Act.22    (g) The Department shall adopt rules necessary to 23administer and enforce this Act.24(Source: P.A. 102-1143, eff. 1-1-24.) 25    (820 ILCS 192/35)  HB5128- 14 -LRB104 18809 SPS 32252 b1    Sec. 35. Penalties and enforcement. An employer that 2violates this Act or any rule adopted under this Act shall be 3subject to a civil penalty of:4        (1) for a first offense, a fine not to exceed $250;5        (2) for a second offense, following a period of 14 6    days to cure the violation, a fine not to exceed $1,000; 7    and8        (3) for a third or subsequent offense, a fine not to 9    exceed $2,500.10    The Department shall have discretion to waive any civil 11penalty under this Section. In determining the amount of the 12penalty under this Section, the Department shall consider the 13appropriateness of the penalty compared to the size of the 14business operated by the employer $2,500 for each separate 15offense. An offense means any violation of this Act with the 16exception of a violation of the notice requirement in 17subsection (c) of Section 20. Any penalties collected from an 18employer under this Section or under subsection (d) of Section 1920 for violations of this Act shall be deposited into the Paid 20Leave for All Workers Fund, a special fund created in the State 21treasury that is dedicated to enforcing this Act. 22(Source: P.A. 102-1143, eff. 1-1-24.)